District of Columbia statutes.
4-213.03

Repealed

Basis for computation of contribution.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1303, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(sss), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-213.3.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(sss) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
See notes to § 4-213.02.